Utah, session 2026, SB35.
Section 1. Section 63I-1-278 is amended to read:63I-1-278Effective 05/06/26. Repeal dates: Title 78A and Title 78B.(1)Subsection 78A-7-106(7), regarding the transfer of a criminal action involving a domestic violence offense from the justice court to the district court, is repealed July 1, 2029.(2)Section 78B-3-421, Arbitration agreements, is repealed July 1, 2029.(3)Section 78B-4-518, Limitation on liability of employer for an employee convicted of an offense, is repealed July 1, 2029.(4)Title 78B, Chapter 6, Part 2, Alternative Dispute Resolution Act, is repealed July 1, 2026. (5)Section 78B-22-805, Interdisciplinary Parental Representation Pilot Program, is repealed December 31, 20262031.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 78B-22-805 is amended to read:78B-22-805Effective 05/06/26Repealed 12/31/26. Interdisciplinary Parental Representation Pilot Program -- Employment restriction.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Parental representation liaison" means an individual who has a bachelor's or graduate degree in social work, sociology, psychology, human services, or a closely related field.(b)"Program" means the Interdisciplinary Parental Representation Pilot Program created in this section.(2)(a)There is created within the commission the Interdisciplinary Parental Representation Pilot Program.(b)The purpose of the program is to enhance the legal representation of a parent in a child welfare case by including a parental representation liaison as a member of the parent's interdisciplinary legal team.(3)(a)A county may submit a proposal to the commission for a grant to develop a parental representation liaison position to provide services to parents involved in a child welfare case in the county.(b)A proposal described in Subsection (3)(a) shall include details regarding:(i)how the county plans to use the grant award to fulfill the purpose described in Subsection (2);(ii)any plan to use funding sources in addition to a grant awarded under this section for the proposal; and(iii)other information the commission determines necessary to evaluate the proposal for a grant award under this section.(c)In evaluating a proposal for a grant award under this section, the commission shall consider:(i)the extent to which the proposal will fulfill the purpose described in Subsection (2);(ii)the cost of the proposal;(iii)the extent to which other funding sources identified in the proposal are likely to benefit the proposal;(iv)the sustainability of the proposal;(v)the need for parental representation liaison engagement in child welfare cases in the county that submitted the proposal; and(vi)whether the proposal will support improvements in indigent defense services in accordance with the commission core principles described in Section 78B-22-404.(4)Before October 1, 20232026, the commission shall provide a written report to the Health and Human Services Interim Committee regarding the program that includes information on:(a)the number of grants awarded under the program; and(b)whether the program had any impact on child welfare case outcomes.(5)An individual who was employed by the Division of Child and Family Services may not be employed by, contract with, or otherwise provide compensated services for the program for a period of one year after the day on which the individual's employment with the division ends.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.